Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB102.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2314 of Title 58 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding subsections to read:§ 2314. Distribution of fee.* * *(d.1) Prohibition and presumption.--(1) Notwithstanding subsection (d)(2) and (3), the commission shall not distribute revenue to any municipality that maintains a zoning or other ordinance that unreasonably limits or prohibits future development of unconventional natural gas wells within the municipality as determined by the commission.(2) A municipality's zoning or other ordinance shall be presumed to have unreasonably limited or prohibited future 123456789101112131415161718 development of unconventional natural gas wells if the municipality has adopted or enacted a zoning or other ordinance that imposes a standard or condition on well development that conflicts with or exceeds those contained in Chapter 32 (relating to development).(d.2) Restricted account.--Upon notice to the commission that a party has initiated litigation challenging the validity of a zoning or other ordinance that the party alleges is in violation of Chapter 32 or that unreasonably limits or prohibits future development of unconventional natural gas wells, the commission shall place any revenue otherwise due to a municipality under subsection (d)(2) or (3) into a restricted account maintained by the commission. No revenue shall be distributed to the municipality until the conclusion of the litigation.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0102PN0113 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617